Maine, session 132, LD369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6103, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 395, §3, is
further amended to read:
3-A. Fees. The Commissioner of Public Safety shall assess a fee set annually by the
Commissioner of Education for each initial criminal history record check and a fee set
annually by the Commissioner of Education for each renewal criminal history record check
required by this section. The Commissioner of Public Safety may not assess a fee for
fingerprinting an applicant for a conditional certificate pursuant to section 13012-A,
subsection 1, paragraph D.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13011-B is enacted to read:
§13011-B. Conditional certification extension based on extenuating circumstances
Notwithstanding the term of a conditional certificate under section 13012-A,
subsection 2, upon request of a school administrative unit, the commissioner may grant an
extension on an individual’s conditional certificate in the case of extenuating
circumstances, including, but not limited to, public health emergencies, illness of the
individual or an inability of the individual to teach for an extended period of time. The
request for an extension must be accompanied by supporting documentation of the
extenuating circumstances, which may include, but is not limited to, correspondence from
a physician or a written request from the superintendent of the school administrative unit
where the individual is employed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13012-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §11 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
1. Conditional certificate. The commissioner may issue a conditional certificate to:
A. An individual who has not met all of the requirements for a certificate as set forth
in section 13013, 13019‑I, 13019‑G or 13022.;
B. An individual who is eligible for an endorsement to teach in a teacher shortage area
as determined by the commissioner; or
C. A holder of a professional teacher certificate under section 13013 who is
transitioning to another endorsement; or
D. An individual who has been employed as a full-time professor at a college or
university in the State for at least 5 years.